src/morphology/stems/numbers.lexc
LEXICON CardinalNumbersSingle       ! may only exist as a single token
  < Number > CardinalWithStandardEnding ;
  < Number > CardinalWithOrdinalEnding ;
  < Number > CardinalWithFractionEnding ;
  < PercentNum > CardinalNoEnd ;
  < PercentNum > CardinalWithStandardEnding ;

LEXICON CardinalNumbersInComp       ! may be followed by a word (in compounds)
  < Number > CardinalNoEnd ;

LEXICON CardinalNoEnd
             +Num+Card: # ;

LEXICON CardinalWithStandardEnding

             +Num+Card: STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;
             +Num+Card:%- STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;
             +Num+Card: LINE_DERIVATION ;
             +Num+Card:%- LINE_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON CardinalWithOrdinalEnding

           +Num+Ord+Sg:nda STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
           +Num+Ord+Sg:%-nda STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
           +Num+Ord+Sg:ndat PARTITIVE ;
           +Num+Ord+Sg:%-ndat PARTITIVE ;
           +Num+Ord+Pl:ndad NOMINATIVE ;
           +Num+Ord+Pl:%-ndad NOMINATIVE ;
           +Num+Ord+Pl:ndate STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
           +Num+Ord+Pl:%-ndate STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
           +Num+Ord+Pl:ndaid PARTITIVE ;
       +Num+Ord+Pl+Nom:%-ndaid PARTITIVE ;
  +Num+Ord+Pl+Use/Rare:ndai STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
  +Num+Ord+Pl+Use/Rare:%-ndai STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON CardinalWithFractionEnding

             +Num+Card:ndik ELANIK ;
             +Num+Card:%-ndik ELANIK ;

LEXICON OrdinalNumbers
  < OrdinalNum > OrdinalNoEnd ;

LEXICON OrdinalNoEnd
              +Num+Ord: # ;
